Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1289.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of December 14, 1988 (P.L.1192, No.147), known as the Special Ad Hoc Municipal Police and Firefighter Postretirement Adjustment Act, is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 4-A12345678910111213141516171819202122 2026 SPECIAL AD HOC MUNICIPAL POLICE ANDFIREFIGHTER POSTRETIREMENT ADJUSTMENTSection 401-A. Entitlement to 2026 special ad hoc postretirement adjustment.A municipal retirement system shall pay a retired police officer or firefighter a special ad hoc postretirement adjustment under this chapter if all of the following apply:(1) The retiree has terminated active employment with the municipality as a police officer or firefighter.(2) The retiree is receiving a retirement benefit from a municipal retirement system on the basis of active employment with the municipality as a police officer or firefighter.(3) The retiree began receiving the retirement benefit before January 1, 2016.Section 402-A. Amount of 2026 special ad hoc postretirement adjustment.(a) General rule.--Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c), a municipal retirement system shall pay a retired police officer or firefighter a monthly special ad hoc postretirement adjustment under section 401-A that shall be calculated as follows:(1) The sum of $250 a month, if on January 1, 2026, the retiree has been retired at least 10 years but less than 15 years.(2) The sum of $375 a month, if on January 1, 2026, the retiree has been retired at least 15 years but less than 20 years.(3) The sum of $500 a month, if on January 1, 2026, the retiree has been retired at least 20 years.(b) Limitation.--If, under section 401-A, a retiree is 20250HB1289PN1470 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 entitled to be paid a special ad hoc postretirement adjustment by more than one municipal retirement system, the amount of the special ad hoc postretirement adjustment under subsection (a) shall be reduced so that the total of all these adjustments paid to the retiree does not exceed the amount specified in subsection (a).(c) Modification in amount of 2026 special ad hoc postretirement adjustment.--The amount of the special ad hoc postretirement adjustment calculated under subsection (a) shall be reduced annually by 65% of the total amount of any postretirement adjustments provided to the retiree under the municipal retirement plan after January 1, 2002, and before December 31, 2025, and paid in the immediately preceding year.Section 2. Section 502.1(a)(2) of the act is amended to read:Section 502.1. Reimbursement by Commonwealth for 2002 special ad hoc adjustment.(a) General rule.--* * *(2) The determination of the reimbursable amount of the amortization contribution requirement attributable to the special ad hoc postretirement adjustment under Chapter 4 in any year shall be calculated as the amortization contribution requirement attributable to the special ad hoc postretirement adjustments under Chapter 4 and reflected in the determination of the financial requirements of the pension plan under Chapter 3 of the Municipal Pension Plan Funding Standard and Recovery Act for the immediate prior year less the product of that amortization contribution requirement multiplied by the ratio of the amount of general municipal 20250HB1289PN1470 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 pension system State aid allocated to the retirement system in the immediate prior year to the total amount of municipal contributions made to the retirement system from all sources other than employee contributions in the immediate prior year. Where a municipality has issued bonds or notes to fund an unfunded actuarial accrued liability under 53 Pa.C.S. Pt. [V] VII Subpt. B (relating to indebtedness and borrowing) or under other laws applicable to the municipality, the general municipal pension system State aid and municipal contributions used by the municipality to make debt service payments on the bonds or notes, or both, issued to fund an unfunded actuarial accrued liability shall be included in the calculation of the ratio applied to the amortization contribution requirement.* * *Section 3. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 502.2. Reimbursement by Commonwealth for 2026 special ad hoc adjustment.(a) General rule.--(1) Except as provided in subsection (b), beginning in the year following the year in which the amortization contribution requirement attributable to a special ad hoc postretirement adjustment under Chapter 4-A is first reflected in the financial requirements of the retirement system determined under Chapter 3 of the act of December 18, 1984 (P.L.1005, No.205), known as the Municipal Pension Plan Funding Standard and Recovery Act, the Auditor General shall determine the Commonwealth reimbursement payable to the municipality representing the amortization contribution requirement attributable to the special ad hoc postretirement 20250HB1289PN1470 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 adjustment under Chapter 4-A that was paid with revenues of the municipality other than general municipal pension system State aid provided under the Municipal Pension Plan Funding Standard and Recovery Act.(2) The determination of the reimbursable amount of the amortization contribution requirement attributable to the special ad hoc postretirement adjustment under Chapter 4-A in any year shall be calculated as the amortization contribution requirement attributable to the special ad hoc postretirement adjustments under Chapter 4-A and reflected in the determination of the financial requirements of the pension plan under Chapter 3 of the Municipal Pension Plan Funding Standard and Recovery Act for the immediate prior year less the product of that amortization contribution requirement multiplied by the ratio of the amount of general municipal pension system State aid allocated to the retirement system in the immediate prior year to the total amount of municipal contributions made to the retirement system from all sources other than employee contributions in the immediate prior year. Where a municipality has issued bonds or notes to fund an unfunded actuarial accrued liability under 53 Pa.C.S. Pt. VII Subpt. B (relating to indebtedness and borrowing) or under other laws applicable to the municipality, the general municipal pension system State aid and municipal contributions used by the municipality to make debt service payments on the bonds or notes, or both, issued to fund an unfunded actuarial accrued liability shall be included in the calculation of the ratio applied to the amortization contribution requirement.(3) The Commonwealth shall reimburse a municipality, 20250HB1289PN1470 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 from the General Fund, for the reimbursable amount determined for each year under this paragraph.(b) Limitation of eligibility.--(1) The Commonwealth shall not reimburse any municipality for a special ad hoc adjustment paid under Chapter 4-A if the information required under section 901(a)(2) either was not certified to the Auditor General or was certified after April 1 of the year the certification was due.(2) The Commonwealth shall not reimburse a municipality for the reimbursable amount of the amortization contribution requirement attributable to the special ad hoc postretirement adjustment under Chapter 4-A if the municipality fails to submit a complete certification of the reimbursable amount of the amortization contribution requirement determined under subsection (a) to the Auditor General before April 1 of the year in which the reimbursement is payable.(c) Variable definition of amortization contribution requirement.--For purposes of this section, the term "amortization contribution requirement" shall have the meaning specified in this subsection as follows:(1) In a municipal pension plan with defined benefits for which the municipality determines the financial requirements of the pension plan under section 302 of the Municipal Pension Plan Funding Standard and Recovery Act, the term "amortization contribution requirement" shall mean the amortization contribution requirement attributable to the special ad hoc postretirement adjustments under Chapter 4-A that was reflected in the financial requirements of the pension plan determined for the immediate prior year.20250HB1289PN1470 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) In a municipal pension plan without defined benefits for which the municipality determines the financial requirements of the pension plan under section 303 of the Municipal Pension Plan Funding Standard and Recovery Act, the term "amortization contribution requirement" shall mean the sum of the payments made to the retirement system in the immediate prior year in order to provide the special ad hoc postretirement adjustments under Chapter 4-A in that year.Section 4. Section 901(a) of the act is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 901. Municipal retirement system certification of adjustments paid and of reimbursable amounts.(a) Certification.--* * *(3) Beginning in the year 2026, a municipality with a retirement system that pays a special ad hoc postretirement adjustment under Chapter 4-A in a year shall certify its reimbursable amount under section 502.2(a) to the Auditor General not later than April 1 of the following year.* * *Section 5. Section 903 of the act is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 903. Municipal receipt of reimbursement payment.* * *(c) 2026 postretirement adjustment reimbursement.--Upon receipt of the reimbursement payment from the Commonwealth for the postretirement adjustments under Chapter 4-A, the treasurer of the municipality shall deposit the reimbursement payment into the municipality's general fund.Section 6. The following shall apply:20250HB1289PN1470 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The special ad hoc postretirement adjustment under section 401-A of the act shall be effective on the date of the first retirement benefit made after January 1, 2026.(2) If the special ad hoc postretirement adjustment under section 401-A of the act is not included in the initial retirement benefit payment occurring after January 1, 2026, the special ad hoc postretirement adjustment shall be included as soon as practicable in the retirement benefit payment of the retiree, and the initial retirement benefit payment that includes the special ad hoc postretirement adjustment shall also include the total amount of the special ad hoc postretirement adjustments previously omitted from the retirement benefit payments made after January 1, 2026.Section 7. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1289PN1470 - 8 - 1234567891011121314